South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4258.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Article 1, Chapter 55, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-55-35.  It is prohibited for any public water system in this State to add to the drinking water supply chemical compounds containing the fluoride ion including, but not limited to, sodium fluoride, sodium silicofluoride, and hydrofluorosilic acid. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----